District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Porchfest Permitting Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Block Party Act of 2012, effective October 23, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-190; D.C.
Official Code § 9-631 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 9-631) is amended by adding a new paragraph (5) to
read as follows:
“(5) “Porchfest” means a distributed neighborhood music festival where
musicians perform on a resident’s private property, such as their porch or yard, or any abutting
public property, and no fee is charged to participants or attendees.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 9-632) is amended by adding a new subsection (b-1)
to read as follows:
“(b-1) A District resident may submit a block party application requesting that a street on
which they reside be closed for the purpose of holding a porchfest.”.
(c) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 9-634(a)) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) It is the policy of the District to approve block parties, including porchfests.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2